District of Columbia statutes.
48-802.01

Interference with disclosure of price information prohibited.

No person may directly or indirectly prohibit, hinder or restrict or attempt to prohibit or restrict the disclosure by any pharmacy, government agency, or other person, of accurate price information regarding prescription drugs, including such disclosure made by means of advertisements in print or broadcast media, or by other means.

Sept. 10, 1976, D.C. Law 1-81, title II, § 201, 23 DCR 2460
1981 Ed., § 33-721.
1973 Ed., § 33-821.